Utah statutes.
17-50-406.   Officers not to advocate claims -- Right to oppose claims.
(1)  No county officer may, except for the officer's own services, present any
claim, account, or demand for allowance against the county or in any way
advocate the relief asked in the claim or demand made by any other person.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a county officer may forward to the
county executive a claim made by another and may endorse on the claim the
officer's recommendation to the county executive regarding payment of the
claim.
(3)  Any person may appear before the county executive and oppose the
allowance of any claim or demand made against the county.
